Tennessee, session 114, SB1718.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 15, Chapter 2, is amended by adding
the following as a new section:
November 2 of each year is to be observed as "James K. Polk Day," to honor the
service of President James K. Polk to the State of Tennessee and the United States of
America.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 010848